Georgia, session 2025_26, HB366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The Former Republic of Vietnam was an ally of the United States of America during
the Vietnam War;
(2) South Vietnamese fled their homeland during the fall of Saigon on April 30, 1975,
many of those families making their home in this state;
(3) Since the end of the Vietnam War, Vietnamese Americans have contributed in ways
that affect all aspects of life in Georgia, including working as teachers, doctors, farmers,
small business owners, athletes, engineers, religious leaders, attorneys, and more;
H. B. 366
- 1 -

LC 56 0284
(4) As it is important for future generations to understand the history of service between
the United States of America and South Vietnam during the Vietnam War, it is important
to recognize and honor the Vietnamese community in Georgia; and
(5) It is, therefore, abundantly fitting and proper that the State of Georgia appropriately
recognize and celebrate Vietnamese culture and tradition by designating April 29 of each
year as "Heritage and Freedom Flag of the Former Republic of Vietnam Day" in Georgia.
SECTION 2.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
(a) April 29 of each year is designated as 'Heritage and Freedom Flag of the Former
Republic of Vietnam Day' in Georgia."
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 366
- 2 -